Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1615
Sections; not applicable; when.

Sections 70-1602 to 70-1614 shall not apply to any disconnections or interruptions of services made necessary by the utility for reasons of repair or maintenance or to protect the health or safety of the domestic subscriber or of the general public.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2715;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 15.